Alabama, session 2026rs, HB597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known as the Rural
Behavioral and Mental Health Access Act.
Page 1

Behavioral and Mental Health Access Act.
HB597 INTRODUCED
Section 2. As used in this act, unless otherwise
specified or unless the context requires otherwise, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROVIDER. A licensed
psychiatrist, psychologist, social worker, counselor,
addiction specialist, or psychiatric nurse practitioner.
(2) DEPARTMENT. Alabama Department of Mental Health.
(3) RURAL AREA. Any area within this state not included
within the boundaries of any incorporated city or town having
a population in excess of 25,000 inhabitants, according to the
last federal decennial census.
Section 3. (a) There is hereby created a fund which
shall be known as the Rural Behavioral Health and Mental
Health Access Fund in the State Treasury for providing grants,
scholarships, and funds for the programs pursuant to this act.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, federal
funds, or legislative appropriations for purposes of
administering this act and providing funding for grants,
scholarships, and providing technical assistance for primary
care practices that integrate behavioral health services.
(c) Amounts in the fund shall be budgeted and allotted
in accordance with Sections 41-4-69 through 41-4-80 and
Sections 41-19-1 through 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 4. (a) Subject to funds being available for
such purpose, the department shall establish a competitive
grant program to:
(1) Support construction, renovation, or expansion of
rural mental health and substance use treatment facilities;
Page 2

rural mental health and substance use treatment facilities;
HB597 INTRODUCED
and
(2) Fund staffing and start-up operational costs.
(b) Eligible applicants for this grant include
nonprofits, community health centers, counties, and tribal
entities.
Section 5. (a) Subject to funds being available for
such purpose, the department shall offer grants to rural
providers for:
(1) Purchase of telehealth-capable diagnostic and
therapy equipment;
(2) Broadband installation and technical support; and
(3) Staff training in telebehavioral health delivery.
(b) Priority shall be given to providers serving
high-need, low-access rural populations.
Section 6. (a) Subject to funds being available for
such purpose, The department shall fund primary care practices
that integrate behavioral health services through:
(1) Hiring or co-locating mental health professionals.
(2) Implementing collaborative care models.
(3) Establishing warm hand-off and care coordination
protocols.
(b) The department shall make all reasonable efforts to
provide technical assistance to support the implementation of
these services.
Section 7. (a) Subject to funds being available for
such purpose, the department shall offer financial incentives
to build the rural mental health workforce including:
(1) Scholarships for students entering behavioral
Page 3

(1) Scholarships for students entering behavioral
HB597 INTRODUCED
health fields who commit to rural practice; and
(2) Loan repayment for licensed providers who work in
rural areas for at least two years.
(b) Funds may be used for tuition, licensure fees, and
relocation costs.
Section 8. The department shall adopt rules necessary
to implement, administer, and facilitate this act.
Section 9. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4